California statutes. Insurance Code
(i) “Policy” means a policy or certificate of life insurance that provides a death benefit. “Policy” does not include any of the following:

(1) A policy or certificate of life insurance that provides a death benefit under an employee welfare benefit plan subject to the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) for which the insurer does not provide
 recordkeeping services, or under any federal employee benefit program.

(2) A funeral insurance contract, as defined in Section 10240.

(3) A policy or certificate of credit life insurance as defined in Section 779.2.

(4) An accidental death or health policy, rider, or certificate, including, but not limited to, a disability or long-term care policy, rider, or certificate.

(5) A joint and survivor annuity contract, if an annuitant is still living.

(6) A policy issued to a group master policyholder for which the insurer does not provide recordkeeping services.

(j) “Recordkeeping services” means circumstances under which an insurer has agreed with a group life insurance policyholder or contractholder to be responsible for obtaining, maintaining, and administering, in its own or its agents’ systems, at least all of the following information about each individual insured under an insured’s group insurance contract or a line of coverage:

(1) Social security number, individual taxpayer identification number, or name and date of birth.

(2) Beneficiary designation information.

(3) Coverage eligibility.

(4) Benefit amount.

(5) Premium payment
 status.

(k) “Records” means information regarding policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset accounts maintained in an insurer’s administrative systems or the administrative systems of a third party retained by the insurer. “Records” does not include information regarding policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset accounts maintained by a group life insurance policyholder or contractholder, or information that has been deleted from an insurer’s administrative system consistent with this act and the insurer’s record retention and destruction policies.

(l) “Retained asset account” means a mechanism whereby the
 settlement of proceeds payable under a policy or individual annuity contract, including, but not limited to, the payment of cash surrender value, is accomplished by the insurer or an entity acting on behalf of the insurer establishing an account with check or draft writing privileges, if those proceeds are retained by the insurer, pursuant to a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits.

(m) “Retained asset accountholder” means the owner of a retained asset account or other person to file a claim for, or otherwise receive proceeds in accordance with the terms of, the retained asset account.

(n) “Thorough search” means reasonable and good faith efforts, documented by an insurer, to identify a beneficiary, determine a current address for the
 beneficiary, and contact the beneficiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 740)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.943.

(a) This article applies to an in-force policy, annuity contract, or retained asset account, a policy or annuity contract effective on or after July 1, 2020, and a policy that has lapsed on or after January 1, 2019, if the insurer has not engaged in asymmetric conduct.

(b) This article applies to a policy, annuity contract, or retained asset account described in subdivision (a) if one of the following applies:

(1) The insurer is domiciled in this state.

(2) The policy, annuity contract, or retained asset account was issued or delivered in
 this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 740)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.944.

(a) An insurer shall comply with the following requirements for performing a comparison of a policy, annuity contract, or retained asset account against the Death Master File:

(1) An insurer that has engaged in asymmetric conduct shall compare all in-force policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset accounts and policies that have lapsed from the date it first used the Death Master File to July 1, 2020, against the complete Death Master File to identify potential matches of its insureds.

(2) An insurer that has not engaged in asymmetric conduct shall compare all in-force policies, annuity contracts, and
 retained asset accounts and policies that have lapsed on or after January 1, 2019, against the complete Death Master File to identify potential matches of its insureds.

(3) If an insurer meets one of the following criteria on July 1, 2020, the insurer is not required to conduct the comparison specified in paragraph (1) or (2) for any in-force policies:

(A) The insurer has entered into a regulatory settlement agreement with the
 department regarding claims handling practices and the use of the Death Master File.

(B) The insurer has received a targeted market conduct examination report issued by an insurance regulator for a multistate examination regarding claims handling practices and the use of the Death Master File, and the report did not find violations of law.

(4) After an initial review as specified in paragraph (1) or (2), or if an insurer is exempted from paragraphs (1) and (2) pursuant to paragraph (3), an insurer shall compare all in-force policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset accounts and policies that have lapsed within the last 18 months against any updates to the Death Master File at least
 semiannually to identify potential matches of its insureds. If the insurer conducts a Death Master File search for policies, annuities, or retained asset accounts
 more frequently than semiannually, the insurer shall conduct a Death Master File search of all policies, annuities, or retained asset accounts with the same frequency.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), within six months of acquisition of a policy or annuity contract from another insurer, the acquiring insurer shall compare all newly acquired policies and annuity contracts that were not searched by the previous insurer against the complete Death Master File to identify potential matches of its insureds and annuitants.

(B) Upon acquisition of a policy or annuity contract from another insurer, if the previous insurer has already conducted a search of the newly acquired policies and annuity contracts using the complete Death Master File, the acquiring
 insurer shall compare all newly acquired policies and annuity contracts using all of the Death Master File updates since the time the previous insurer conducted the complete search to identify potential matches of its insureds and annuitants.

(6) In addition to accounting for exact matches of names, social security numbers, individual taxpayer identification numbers, and dates of birth of insureds, an insurer also shall conduct the comparisons required under this section following reasonable procedures that account for all of the following:

(A) Common nicknames, initials used in lieu of a first or middle name, use of a middle name, compound first and middle names, and interchanged first and middle names.

(B) Compound last names, surname given at birth or married names, and hyphens, blank spaces or apostrophes in last names.

(C) Transposition of the month and date numerals in the date of birth.

(D) Incomplete social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(E) Common data entry errors that account for transposed numbers.

(7) Upon identifying a potential match pursuant to this section, an insurer shall promptly make reasonable good faith efforts to validate the match by confirming the death of an insured.

(b) (1) Upon receipt of information
 establishing knowledge of death of an insured, other than if an insurer has made a match pursuant to subdivision (a), the insurer shall check its records to determine whether the insurer has any other policies, annuity contracts, or retained asset accounts for that insured.

(2) Upon receipt of information establishing knowledge of death of an insured the insurer shall do both of the following:

(A) Notify each United States affiliate, parent, or subsidiary company of the insurer, as appropriate, and any entity with which the insurer contracts that may maintain or control records related to policies, annuity contracts, or retained asset accounts of the
 knowledge of death or match pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) Make a reasonable and good faith effort to ensure that each affiliate, parent, or subsidiary company of the insurer or other entity performs a check of their records to determine whether they have any other policies, annuity contracts, or retained asset accounts for that insured.

(c) If an insurer has not been contacted by a beneficiary within 120 days of an insurer’s receipt of information establishing the insurer’s knowledge of death of an insured, the insurer shall conduct a thorough search, which shall be completed within one year from the date the insurer received that information.

(d) An insurer may disclose the minimum necessary personal information
 about an insured or beneficiary to a person to whom the insurer reasonably believes may be able to assist the insurer to locate a beneficiary or a person otherwise entitled to payment of the proceeds. The insurer shall not implement policies or practices that may diminish the rights of, or amounts of proceeds due to, beneficiaries under its policies, annuity contracts, or retained asset accounts.

(e) An insurer or its service provider may not charge a beneficiary or other authorized representative for any fees or costs associated with a Death Master File search or verification of a Death Master File match conducted pursuant to this section.

(f) If the insurer locates a beneficiary, within 15 days after the date of location, the insurer shall provide appropriate claims forms or
 instructions to the beneficiary to make a claim if the insurer has not already received a claim from that beneficiary.

(g) If an insurer fails to locate a beneficiary following a thorough search, the insurer shall report and remit the proceeds pursuant to Section 1515 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), at no later than the policy delivery or the establishment of an account, and upon a change of insured or beneficiary, an insurer shall request information from the insured sufficient to ensure that all benefits or proceeds are distributed to the appropriate persons upon the death of the insured, including, at a minimum, the name, address, date of birth, social security number or individual taxpayer identification number, and
 telephone number of every insured and beneficiary of a policy or account.

(2) If an insurer issues a policy or provides an account based on information received directly from an insured’s employer, the insurer may obtain the beneficiary information described in paragraph (1) by communicating with the insured after the insurer’s receipt of the information from the insured’s employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 740)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.945.

(a) Failure to meet a requirement of this article knowingly or with such frequency as to constitute a general practice is an unfair and deceptive act pursuant to Section 790.03.

(b) This article does not create or imply a private right of action for a violation of this article.

(c) Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided for by this article are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 740)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.946.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (SB 740)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Life Insurance Policy Illustrations [10509.950. - 10509.965.]

10509.950.

In order to protect consumers and foster consumer education, this chapter shall govern the regulation of life insurance policy illustrations. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to ensure that illustrations do not mislead purchasers of life insurance and to make illustrations more understandable by providing illustration formats, prescribing standards to be followed when illustrations are used, and specifying the disclosures that are required in connection with illustrations. Insurers should, as far as possible, eliminate the use of footnotes and caveats and define terms used in the illustration in language that is understandable by a typical person within the segment of the public to which the illustration is directed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.952.

This chapter shall apply to all group and individual life insurance policies and certificates except as follows:

(a) Variable life insurance.

(b) Individual and group annuity contracts.

(c) Credit life insurance.

(d) Life insurance policies with no illustrated death benefits on any individual exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.953.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Actuarial Standards Board” means the board established by the American Academy of Actuaries to develop and promulgate standards of actuarial practice.

(b) “Contract premium” means the gross premium that is required to be paid under a fixed premium policy, including the premium for a rider for which benefits are shown in the illustration.

(c) “Currently payable scale” means a scale of nonguaranteed elements in effect for a policy form as of the preparation date of the illustration or declared to become effective within the next 95 days.

(d) “Disciplined current scale” means a scale of nonguaranteed elements constituting a limit on illustrations currently being illustrated by an insurer that is reasonably based on actual recent historical experience, as certified annually by an illustration actuary designated by the insurer. Further guidance in determining the disciplined current scale as contained in standards established by the Actuarial Standards Board may be relied upon if the standards meet all of the following:

(1) Have not been found to be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter by the commissioner after a hearing held in accordance with Sections 11500 to 11530, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(2) Limit a disciplined current scale to reflect only actions that have already been taken or events that have already occurred.

(3) Do not permit a disciplined current scale to include any projected trends of improvements in experience or any assumed improvements in experience beyond the illustration date.

(4) Do not permit assumed expenses to be less than minimum assumed expenses.

(e) “Generic name” means a short title descriptive of the policy being illustrated such as whole life, “term life” or “flexible premium adjustable life.”

(f) “Guaranteed elements” means the premiums, benefits, values, credits or charges under a policy of life insurance that are guaranteed and determined at issue.

(g) “Illustrated scale” means a scale of nonguaranteed elements currently being illustrated that is not more favorable to the policy owner than the lesser of either of the following:

(1) The disciplined current scale.

(2) The currently payable scale.

(h) “Illustration” means a presentation or depiction that includes nonguaranteed elements of a policy of life insurance over a period of years and that is one of the three types defined below:

(1) “Basic illustration” means a ledger or proposal used in the sale of a life insurance policy that shows both guaranteed and nonguaranteed elements.

(2) “Supplemental illustration” means an illustration furnished in addition to a basic illustration that meets the applicable requirements of this regulation, and that may be presented in a format differing from the basic illustration, but may only depict a scale of nonguaranteed elements that is permitted in a basic illustration.

(3) “In force illustration” means an illustration furnished at any time after the policy that it depicts has been in force for one year or more.

(i) “Illustration actuary” means an actuary meeting the requirements of Section 10509.960 who certifies to illustrations based on the standard of practice promulgated by the Actuarial Standards Board.

(j) “Lapse-supported illustration” means an illustration of a policy form failing the test of self-supporting as defined in this chapter, under a modified persistency rate assumption using persistency rates underlying the disciplined current scale for the first five years and 100 percent policy persistency thereafter.

(k) “Life insurance” means insurance upon the lives of persons or appertaining thereto.

(l) (1) “Minimum assumed expenses” means the minimum expenses that may be used in the calculation of the disciplined current scale for a policy form. The insurer may choose to designate each year the method of determining assumed expenses for all policy forms from all of the following:

(A) Fully allocated expenses.

(B) Marginal expenses.

(C) A generally recognized expense table based on fully allocated expenses representing a significant portion of insurance companies and approved by the commissioner.

(2) Marginal expenses may be used only if greater than a generally recognized expense table. If no generally recognized expense table is approved, fully allocated expenses must be used.

(m) “Non-guaranteed elements” means the premiums, benefits, values, credits or charges under a policy of life insurance that are not guaranteed or not determined at issue.

(n) “Non-term group life” means a group policy or individual policies of life insurance issued to members of an employer group or other permitted group that includes all of the following:

(1) Every plan of coverage was selected by the employer or other group representative.

(2) Some portion of the premium is paid by the group or through payroll deduction.

(3) Group underwriting or simplified underwriting is used.

(o) “Policy owner” means the owner named in the policy or the certificate holder in the case of a group policy.

(p) “Premium outlay” means the amount of premium assumed to be paid by the policy owner or other premium payer out-of-pocket.

(q) “Self-supporting illustration” means an illustration of a policy form for which it can be demonstrated that, when using experience assumptions underlying the disciplined current scale, for all illustrated points in time on or after the 15th policy anniversary or the 20th policy anniversary for second-or-later-to-die policies (or upon policy expiration if sooner), the accumulated value of all policy cash-flows equals or exceeds the total policy owner value available. For this purpose, policy owner value will include cash surrender values and any other illustrated benefit amounts available at the policy owner’s election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.954.

(a) Each insurer marketing policies to which this chapter is applicable shall notify the commissioner whether a policy form is to be marketed with or without an illustration. For all policy forms being actively marketed on the effective date of this chapter, the insurer shall identify in writing those forms and whether or not an illustration will be used with them. For policy forms filed after the effective date of this chapter, the identification shall be made at the time of filing. Any previous identification may be changed by notice to the commissioner.

(b) If the insurer identifies a policy form as one to be marketed without an illustration, any use of an illustration for any policy using that form prior to the first policy anniversary is prohibited.

(c) If a policy form is identified by the insurer as one to be marketed with an illustration, a basic illustration prepared and delivered in accordance with this chapter is required, except that a basic illustration need not be provided to individual members of a group or to individuals insured under multiple lives coverage issued to a single applicant unless the coverage is marketed to these individuals. The illustration furnished an applicant for a group life insurance policy or policies issued to a single applicant on multiple lives may be either an individual or composite illustration representative of the coverage on the lives of members of the group or the multiple lives covered.

(d) Potential enrollees of nonterm group life subject to this chapter shall be furnished a quotation with the enrollment materials. The quotation shall show potential policy values for sample ages and policy years on a guaranteed and nonguaranteed basis appropriate to the group and the coverage. This quotation shall not be considered an illustration for purposes of this chapter, but all information provided shall be consistent with the illustrated scale. A basic illustration shall be provided at delivery of the certificate to enrollees for nonterm group life who enroll for more than the minimum premium necessary to provide pure death benefit protection. In addition, the insurer shall make a basic illustration available to any nonterm group life enrollee who requests it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.955.

(a) An illustration used in the sale of a life insurance policy shall satisfy the applicable requirements of this chapter, be clearly labeled “life insurance illustration,” and include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) Name of insurer.

(2) Name and business address of producer or insurer’s authorized representative, if any.

(3) Name, age and sex of proposed insured, except where a composite illustration is permitted under this chapter.

(4) Underwriting or rating classification upon which the illustration is based.

(5) Generic name of the policy, the company product name, if different, and form number.

(6) Initial death benefit.

(7) Dividend option election or application of nonguaranteed elements, if applicable.

(b) When using an illustration in the sale of a life insurance policy, an insurer or its producers or other authorized representatives shall not do any of the following:

(1) Represent the policy as anything other than a life insurance policy.

(2) Use or describe nonguaranteed elements in a manner that is misleading or has the capacity or tendency to mislead.

(3) State or imply that the payment or amount of nonguaranteed elements is guaranteed.

(4) Use an illustration that does not comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(5) Use an illustration that at any policy duration depicts policy performance more favorable to the policy owner than that produced by the illustrated scale of the insurer whose policy is being illustrated.

(6) Provide an applicant with an incomplete illustration.

(7) Represent in any way that premium payments will not be required for each year of the policy in order to maintain the illustrated death benefits, unless that is the fact.

(8) Use the term “vanishing” or “vanishing premium,” or a similar term that implies the policy becomes paid up, to describe a plan for using nonguaranteed elements to pay a portion of future premiums.

(9) Except for policies that can never develop nonforfeiture values, use an illustration that is “lapse-supported.”

(10) Use an illustration that is not “self-supporting.”

(c) If an interest rate used to determine the illustrated nonguaranteed elements is shown, it shall not be greater than the earned interest rate underlying the disciplined current scale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.956.

(a) A basic illustration shall conform with the following requirements:

(1) The illustration shall be labeled with the date on which it was prepared.

(2) Each page, including any explanatory notes or pages, shall be numbered and show its relationship to the total number of pages in the illustration.

(3) The assumed dates of payment receipt and benefit payout within a policy year shall be clearly identified.

(4) If the age of the proposed insured is shown as a component of the tabular detail, it shall be issue age plus the numbers of years the policy is assumed to have been in force.

(5) The assumed payments on which the illustrated benefits and values are based shall be identified as premium outlay or contract premium, as applicable. For policies that do not require a specific contract premium, the illustrated payments shall be identified as premiums outlay.

(6) Guaranteed death benefits and values available upon surrender, if any, for the illustrated premium outlay or contract premium shall be shown and clearly labeled guaranteed.

(7) If the illustration shows any nonguaranteed elements, they cannot be based on a scale more favorable to the policy owner than the insurer’s illustrated scale at any duration. These elements shall be clearly labeled nonguaranteed.

(8) The guaranteed elements, if any, shall be shown before corresponding nonguaranteed elements and shall be specifically referred to on any page of an illustration that shows or describes only the nonguaranteed elements.

(9) The account or accumulation value of a policy, if shown, shall be identified by the name this value is given in the policy being illustrated and shown in close proximity to the corresponding value available upon surrender.

(10) The value available upon surrender shall be identified by the name this value is given in the policy being illustrated and shall be the amount available to the policy owner in a lump sum after deduction of surrender charges, policy loans, and policy loan interest, as applicable.

(11) Illustrations may show policy benefits and values in graphic or chart form in addition to the tabular form.

(12) Any illustration of nonguaranteed elements shall be accompanied by a statement indicating that:

(A) The benefits and values are not guaranteed.

(B) The assumptions on which they are based are subject to change by the insurer.

(C) Actual results may be more or less favorable.

(13) If the illustration shows that the premium payer may have the option to allow policy charges to be paid using nonguaranteed values, the illustration shall clearly disclose that a charge continues to be required and that, depending on actual results, the premium payer may need to continue or resume premium outlays. Similar disclosure shall be made for premium outlay of lesser amounts or shorter durations than the contract premium. If a contract premium is due, the premium outlay display shall not be left blank or show zero unless accompanied by an asterisk or similar mark to draw attention to the fact that the policy is not paid up.

(14) If the applicant plans to use dividends or policy values, guaranteed or nonguaranteed, to pay all or a portion of the contract premium or policy charges, or for any other purpose, the illustration may reflect those plans and the impact on future policy benefits and values.

(b) A basic illustration shall include all of the following:

(1) A brief description of the policy being illustrated, including a statement that it is a life insurance policy.

(2) A brief description of the premium outlay or contract premium, as applicable, for the policy. For a policy that does not require payment of a specific contract premium, the illustration shall show the premium outlay that must be paid to guarantee coverage for the term of the contract, subject to maximum premiums allowable to qualify as a life insurance policy under the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) A brief description of any policy features, riders or options, guaranteed or nonguaranteed, shown in the basic illustration and the impact they may have on the benefits and values of the policy.

(4) Identification and a brief definition of column headings and key terms used in the illustration.

(5) A statement as follows: “This illustration assumes that the currently illustrated nonguaranteed elements will continue unchanged for all years shown. This is not likely to occur, and actual results may be more or less favorable than those shown.”

(c) (1) Following the narrative summary, a basic illustration shall include a numeric summary of the death benefits and values and the premium outlay and contract premium, as applicable. For a policy that provides for a contract premium, the guaranteed death benefits and values shall be based on the contract premium. This summary shall be shown for at least policy years 5, 10, and 20 and at age 70, if applicable, on the three bases shown below. For multiple life policies the summary shall show policy years 5, 10, 20, and 30.

(A) Policy guarantees.

(B) Insurer’s illustrated scale.

(C) Insurer’s illustrated scale used but with the nonguaranteed elements reduced as follows:

(i) Dividends at 50 percent of the dividends contained in the illustrated scale used.

(ii) Nonguaranteed credited interest at rates that are the average of the guaranteed rates and the rates contained in the illustrated scale used.

(iii) All nonguaranteed charges, including but not limited to, term insurance charges, mortality and expense charges, at rates that are the average of the guaranteed rates and the rates contained in the illustrated scale used.

(2) In addition, if coverage would cease prior to policy maturity or age 100, the year in which coverage ceases shall be identified for each of the three bases.

(d) Statements substantially similar to the following shall be included on the same page as the numeric summary and signed by the applicant, or the policy owner in the case of an illustration provided at time of delivery, as required in this chapter.

(1) A statement to be signed and dated by the applicant or policy owner reading as follows: “I have received a copy of this illustration and understand that any nonguaranteed elements illustrated are subject to change and could be either higher or lower. The agent has told me they are not guaranteed.”

(2) A statement to be signed and dated by the insurance producer or other authorized representative of the insurer reading as follows: “I certify that this illustration has been presented to the applicant and that I have explained that any nonguaranteed elements illustrated are subject to change. I have made no statements that are inconsistent with the illustration.”

(e) (1) A basic illustration shall include the following information for at least each policy year from 1 to 10 and for every fifth policy year thereafter ending at age 100, policy maturity or final expiration; and except for term insurance beyond the 20th year, for any year in which the premium outlay and contract premium, if applicable, is to change:

(A) The premium outlay and mode the applicant plans to pay and the contract premium, as applicable.

(B) The corresponding guaranteed death benefit, as provided in the policy.

(C) The corresponding guaranteed value available upon surrender, as provided in the policy.

(2) For a policy that provides for a contract premium, the guaranteed death benefit and value available upon surrender shall correspond to the contract premium.

(3) Nonguaranteed elements may be shown if described in the contract. In the case of an illustration for a policy on which the insurer intends to credit terminal dividends, they may be shown if the insurer’s current practice is to pay terminal dividends. If any nonguaranteed elements are shown they must be shown at the same durations as the corresponding guaranteed elements, if any. If no guaranteed benefit or value is available at any duration for which a nonguaranteed benefit or value is shown, a zero shall be displayed in the guaranteed column.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.957.

(a) A supplemental illustration may be provided if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) It is appended to, accompanied by, or preceded by a basic illustration that complies with this chapter.

(2) The nonguaranteed elements shown are not more favorable to the policy owner than the corresponding elements based on the scale used in the basic illustration.

(3) It contains the same statement as required of a basic illustration under subdivision (d) of Section 10509.956 that nonguaranteed elements are not guaranteed.

(4) For a policy that has a contract premium, the contract premium underlying the supplemental illustration is equal to the contract premium shown in the basic illustration. For policies that do not require a contract premium, the premium outlay underlying the supplemental illustration shall be equal to the premium outlay shown in the basic illustration.

(b) The supplemental illustration shall include a notice referring to the basic illustration for guaranteed elements and other important information.

(c) If cost indices are required by Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 10509.970), they may be provided by means of a supplemental illustration or included in the basic illustration. Those indices shall be based on nonguaranteed elements calculated according to the standards required in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.958.

(a) (1) If a basic illustration is used by an insurance producer or other authorized representative of the insurer in the sale of a life insurance policy and the policy is applied for as illustrated, a copy of that illustration, signed in accordance with this chapter, shall be submitted to the insurer at the time of the policy application. A copy also shall be provided to the applicant.

(2) If the policy is issued other than as applied for, a revised basic illustration conforming to the policy as issued shall be sent with the policy. The revised illustration shall conform to the requirements of this chapter, shall be labeled “Revised Illustration” and shall be signed and dated by the applicant or policy owner and producer or other authorized representative of the insurer no later than the time the policy is delivered. A copy shall be provided to the insurer and the policy owner.

(b) (1) If no illustration is used by an insurance producer or other authorized representative in the sale of a life insurance policy or if the policy is applied for other than as illustrated, the producer or representative shall certify to that effect in writing on a form provided by the insurer. On the same form the applicant shall acknowledge that no illustration conforming to the policy applied for was provided and shall further acknowledge an understanding that an illustration conforming to the policy as issued will be provided no later than at the time of policy delivery. This form shall be submitted to the insurer at the time of policy application.

(2) If the policy is issued, a basic illustration conforming to the policy as issued shall be sent with the policy and signed by the policy owner no later than the time the policy is delivered. A copy shall be provided to the insurer and the policy owner.

(c) If the basic illustration or revised illustration is sent by the insurer to the applicant or policy owner by mail, it shall include instructions for the applicant or policy owner to sign the duplicate copy of the numeric summary page of the illustration for the policy issued and return the signed copy to the insurer. The insurer’s obligation under this subdivision shall be satisfied if it can demonstrate that it has made a diligent effort to secure a signed copy of the numeric summary page. The requirement to make a diligent effort shall be deemed satisfied if the insurer includes in the mailing a self-addressed postage prepaid envelope with instructions for the return of the signed numeric summary page.

(d) A copy of the basic illustration and a revised basic illustration, if any, signed as applicable, along with any certification that either no illustration was used or that the policy was applied for other than as illustrated, shall be retained by the insurer until three years after the policy is no longer in force. A copy need not be retained if no policy is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.959.

(a) In the case of a policy designated as one for which illustrations will be used, the insurer shall provide each policy owner with an annual report on the status of the policy that shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) For universal life policies, the report shall include the following:

(A) The beginning and end date of the current report period.

(B) The policy value at the end of the previous report period and at the end of the current report period.

(C) The total amounts that have been credited or debited to the policy value during the current report period, identifying each by type, including, but not limited to, interest, mortality, expense and riders.

(D) The current death benefit at the end of the current report period on each life covered by the policy.

(E) The net cash surrender value of the policy as of the end of the current report period.

(F) The amount of outstanding loans, if any, as of the end of the current report period.

(G) For fixed premium policies:

If, assuming guaranteed interest, mortality and expense loads and continued scheduled premium payments, the policy’s net cash surrender value is such that it would not maintain insurance in force until the end of the next reporting period, a notice to this effect shall be included in the report.

(H) For flexible premium policies:

If, assuming guaranteed interest, mortality and expense loads, the policy’s net cash surrender value will not maintain insurance in force until the end of the next reporting period unless further premium payments are made, a notice to this effect shall be included in the report.

(2) For all other policies, the report shall include the following, where applicable:

(A) Current death benefit.

(B) Annual contract premium.

(C) Current cash surrender value.

(D) Current dividend.

(E) Application of current dividend.

(F) Amount of outstanding loan.
